Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 480.345 is amended to read:
480.345. The owner, operator or employee  of a dispensing facility may permit nonretail custom-
ers other than the owner, operator or employee to  use or manipulate at the dispensing facility a
card activated or key activated device for dispensing Class 1 flammable liquids into the  fuel tank
of a motor vehicle or other container under the following conditions:
(1) The owner or operator shall hold a current nonretail facility license issued by the  State Fire
Marshal under ORS 480.350;
[(2) Except as provided in ORS 480.360, a nonretail customer shall purchase at least 900  gallons
of Class 1  flammable liquids or diesel fuel from any source during a 12-month period or, if the amount
of such liquids or fuel purchased is less than 900 gallons annually, file documentation that: ]
[(a) The fuel qualifies as a deductible farming expense on the customer’s federal income tax
return;]
[(b) The fuel was purchased by  a governmental agency providing fire, ambulance or police services;
or]
[(c) The fuel was purchased by: ]
[(A) A people’s utility district organized under ORS chapter 261; ]
[(B) A domestic water supply district organized under ORS chapter 264; ]
[(C) A mass transit district organized under ORS 267.010 to 267.394; ]
[(D) A metropolitan service district organized under ORS chapter 268; ]
[(E) A special road district organized under ORS 371.305 to 371.360; ]
[(F) A 9-1-1 communications district organized under ORS 403.300 to 403.380; ]
[(G) A sanitary district organized under ORS 450.005 to 450.245; ]
[(H) A sanitary authority, water authority or joint water and sanitary  authority organized under
ORS 450.600 to 450.989; ]
[(I) A rural fire protection district organized under ORS chapter 478; ]
[(J) A water improvement district organized under ORS chapter 552; ]
[(K) A water control district organized under ORS chapter 553; or ]
[(L) A port organized under ORS chapter 777. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3478 (HB 3478-A) Page 1
[(3) The nonretail customer shall provide a federal employer  identification number or equivalent
documentation to indicate  participation in a business or employment with a government agency or
nonprofit or charitable organization; ]
[(4) The  nonretail customer, other than the owner or operator, dispensing Class 1 flammable liquids
shall be  employed by a business, government agency or nonprofit or charitable organization and shall
dispense Class 1 flammable liquids only into the fuel  tank of a motor vehicle or other container owned
or used by the business, government agency or nonprofit or charitable organization; ]
[(5)] (2)  The nonretail customer, other than the owner, operator  or employee, dispensing Class
1 flammable liquids shall [ have satisfied ] receive  safety training [ requirements] materials  in com-
pliance with rules of the State Fire Marshal; and
[(6)] (3)  The owner or  operator shall enter into a written agreement with nonretail customers
permitted under this section to  dispense fuel at the nonretail facility. [ Except as otherwise provided
in ORS 480.355, the agreement shall at a minimum: ]
[(a) Certify that the nonretail customer will purchase at least 900 gallons of Class 1  flammable
liquids or diesel fuel from  any source during a 12-month period or, if the amount of such liquids or fuel
purchased is less than 900 gallons annually, file documentation that: ]
[(A) The fuel qualifies  as a deductible farming expense on the customer’s federal income tax return;
or]
[(B) The fuel was purchased by a governmental agency providing fire, ambulance or  police ser-
vices; ]
[(b) Provide a federal employer identification number or equivalent  documentation to indicate par-
ticipation in a business or employment with  a government agency or nonprofit or charitable organiza-
tion;]
[(c) Certify that the nonretail customer is employed by a business, government agency or nonprofit
or charitable organization and that  the nonretail customer shall dispense Class 1 flammable liquids
only into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle or other  container owned or used by the business, government
agency or nonprofit or charitable organization; ]
[(d) Certify that the nonretail customer has satisfied safety  training requirements in compliance
with rules of the State Fire Marshal; and ]
[(e) Require the nonretail customer to submit a sworn statement, as defined in ORS 162.055,  that
the information supplied in the agreement is true and correct. ]
SECTION 2.  ORS 480.350 is amended to read:
480.350. (1) [ Except as provided in ORS 480.355, ] A nonretail facility [ shall] may  not operate
without a license issued under this section.
(2) The State Fire Marshal shall issue a nonretail facility license to  a person if the person
submits an application to the State Fire Marshal on a form approved by the  State Fire Marshal for
each nonretail facility and the application includes:
(a) A statement that the applicant will comply with the requirements of ORS 480.345;
(b) A copy of the form that will be used by the applicant as the  agreement required under ORS
480.345 between the applicant and nonretail customers permitted to dispense fuel at the nonretail
facility;
(c) A sworn statement, as defined in ORS 162.055,  that information supplied in the application
is true and correct; and
(d) An application fee of $300.
(3) The applicant for a nonretail facility  license shall bear the burden of proof that the re-
quirements of this section and of any rules of the State Fire Marshal adopted  to implement this
section are satisfied.
(4) In addition to any license or renewal  fees, a licensee shall pay [ an annual] a fee of [ $10] $30
every three years  for each nonretail customer that enters  into a written agreement with the owner
or operator of the nonretail facility under ORS 480.345.
(5) A  license issued under this section shall be valid for a period of [ one year ] three years  from
the date of issuance.
Enrolled House Bill 3478 (HB 3478-A) Page 2
(6) A license may be renewed  upon payment to the State Fire Marshal of [ an annual] a license
renewal fee of [ $300] $900.
(7) All fees  received by the State Fire Marshal pursuant to this section shall be deposited with
the State Treasurer and shall be placed in the State Fire Marshal Fund.
SECTION 3.  ORS 480.375 is amended to read:
480.375. (1) The State Fire Marshal shall conduct an annual safety inspection  at all nonretail
and dual operations facilities dispensing Class 1 flammable liquids to determine if the  facility is
operating in compliance with the provisions  of ORS 480.310 to 480.385 or of any applicable rule
adopted by the State Fire Marshal.
(2) Every three years,  the State Fire Marshal shall conduct [ annual] audits of at least five
percent of all nonretail  accounts to determine if nonretail facilities are in compliance with the
provisions of ORS 480.310 to 480.385 and any applicable rule adopted by the State Fire Marshal.
(3) The State Fire Marshal shall have the  same authority to enter into all buildings and upon
all dispensing facilities for the purpose of inspection  as is specified in ORS chapter 476 relating to
inspection of fire hazards.
(4) Upon receiving a complaint, or upon the State Fire  Marshal’s own motion, the State Fire
Marshal shall investigate whether a violation of any  provision of ORS 480.310 to 480.385 or of any
applicable rule of the State Fire Marshal has occurred.
CONFORMING AMENDMENTS
SECTION 4.  ORS 480.341 is amended to read:
480.341. (1) As used in this  section, “rural Oregon” means Baker, Clatsop, Crook, Curry, Gilliam,
Grant, Harney, Hood River, Jefferson,  Klamath, Lake, Malheur, Morrow, Sherman, Tillamook,
Umatilla, Union, Wallowa, Wasco and Wheeler Counties.
(2) Subject to subsection (3)  of this section, if a filling station, service station, garage or other
dispensary where Class 1 flammable liquids are dispensed  at retail is located in rural Oregon, the
owner or operator may permit a customer to use or manipulate a device for  dispensing liquids into
the fuel tank of a motor vehicle or  other retail container, regardless of whether an owner, operator
or employee of the dispensary is present at the dispensary.
(3) If the site of a dispensary described in subsection (2)  of this section includes retail space
providing goods or  services, other than goods or services for maintaining, repairing or cleaning a
motor vehicle, the dispensary shall make an owner, operator or employee available for  dispensing
Class 1 flammable liquids after 6 a.m. and before 6 p.m.
(4) If a nonretail facility is located in rural Oregon,  the owner or operator may, subject to ORS
480.340:
(a) Permit the dispensing of Class 1 flammable liquids at retail;
(b) Permit a person other than an owner, operator, employee or nonretail  customer to use or
manipulate a  device for dispensing liquids into the fuel tank of a motor vehicle or other retail con-
tainer; and
(c) Permit the use of an installed automated  payment or self-service dispensing fuel device for
the liquids.
(5)(a) Sales under subsection (2) of this section do not make a filling station,  service station,
garage or other dispensary where Class 1 flammable liquids  are dispensed at retail subject to any
provisions of ORS 480.310 to 480.385 regulating nonretail facilities.
(b) Sales under subsection (4) of this section do not  require that a nonretail facility possess a
license to dispense Class 1 flammable liquids at retail.
[(c) Sales under subsection (4)  of this section do not require that a nonretail facility possess a
conditional use license issued under ORS 480.355. However, sales under subsection (4) of this  section
do not prevent a nonretail  facility that qualifies under ORS 480.355 from also possessing a conditional
use license. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3478 (HB 3478-A) Page 3
[(d) Purchasing Class 1 flammable liquids under subsection (4) of this section does not make  a
retail customer subject to any gallonage requirement set forth in ORS 480.345. ]
[(e)] (c)  Purchasing Class 1  flammable liquids under subsection (4) of this section does not make
a retail customer subject to rules of the  State Fire Marshal establishing safety training require-
ments.
(6) This section does not  prohibit, limit or condition any dispensing of Class 1 flammable liquids
or diesel fuel otherwise authorized under ORS 480.310 to 480.385.
(7) No later than 90 days prior to commencing  sales under subsection (4) of this section, a
nonretail facility shall notify the State Fire Marshal that the  facility plans to dispense Class 1
flammable liquids at retail under this section.
SECTION 5. ORS 480.355 and 480.360 are repealed.
APPLICABILITY
SECTION 6. The amendments to ORS 480.350 by section 2 of this 2025 Act apply to li-
censes issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 7. The unit captions used in this 2025 Act are provided only for the convenience
of the  reader and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or express any leg-
islative intent in the enactment of this 2025 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 8. This 2025 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House May 6, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3478 (HB 3478-A) Page 4